Utah statutes.
59-8-102.   Purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the imposition of an in lieu excise tax on the gross receipts of corporations, other than those described in Subsection 59-7-102(2), eleemosynary, religious, or charitable institutions, operating in this state who are not otherwise required to pay income or franchise taxes to the state or to declare dividends.

